code/xfst/hw2.xfst
!!! COGS 532 (Spring 2019) Sample solution for HW 2
!!!
!!! This solution also handles the Poss suffix and all case markers, which were not part of the HW.
!!!

! Consonants
define C  b|c|ç|d|f|g|ğ|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|r|s|ş|t|v|y|z;

! Consonant features
define -VOICE p|ç|t|k|f|s|ş|h;

! Vowels
define V  a|e|i|o|u|ü|ö|ı;
define V2 V|H|A;

! Orthographic symbols -- all symbols that can appear in words; we omit capitalization.
define O  [C | V];

! Vowel features
define +HIGH i|u|ı|ü; 
define -HIGH e|a|o|ö;
define +LOW a|ö;
define -LOW e|i|ı|o|u|ü;
define +BACK ı|a|o|u;
define -BACK i|e|ö|ü;
define +ROUND ö|ü|o|u;
define -ROUND e|a|i|ı;

define ROOT {ev}|{kolye}|{araba}|{ütü}|{süt}|{korku}|{atom}|{ip}|{çöp}|{varış};

define PluRule %+Plu  -> l A r;

define PossRule %+Poss -> S H N;

define KIRule  %+KI -> k i N;

! Case markers
define Case [%+Acc|%+Dat|%+Loc|%+Gen|%+Abl|%+Ins];

define CaseRule %+Acc ->  Y H ,
                %+Dat ->  Y A ,
                %+Loc ->  D A ,
                %+Abl ->  D A n,
                !%+Ins ->  Y l e,
                %+Gen ->  GN H n;


define PhonemicsRule     S -> s || V _ ,, S -> 0 || \V _ ,,
                        N -> 0 || _ [.#.|l] ,, N -> n || _ \l ,,
                         Y -> 0 || ~[V|H|A] _ ,, Y -> y || [V|H|A] _ ,, 
                        D -> t || %-VOICE _ ,, D -> d || \%-VOICE _ ,,
                        GN -> n || V _ ,, GN -> 0 || \V _ ,,
                        KN -> 0 || _ [%+Plu| .#.] ,, KN -> n || _ [?* - %+Plu] ; 

! the surface form of A is independent of preceding A's and H's; all that the rule
! needs is to reach a vowel in the root, that's why we have [C|H|A]* in the
! context specification.

define ARule      A -> %-HIGH & %-ROUND & %+BACK || %+BACK [C|H|A]* _ ,,
                A -> %-HIGH & %-ROUND & %-BACK || %-BACK [C|H|A]* _ ; 

define HRule          H -> %+HIGH & %+ROUND & %+BACK || [%+BACK & %+ROUND] [C|H]* _ ,, H -> %+HIGH & %+ROUND & %-BACK || [%-BACK & %+ROUND] [C|H]* _ ,,
                      H -> %+HIGH & %-ROUND & %+BACK || [%+BACK & %-ROUND] [C|H]* _ ,,
                      H -> %+HIGH & %-ROUND & %-BACK || [%-BACK & %-ROUND] [C|H]* _ ; 

! Morphotactic machine
! The machine looks simple; but it was not an easy task to arrive at it.
define MAIN  ROOT
             [%+Plu|0]
             [%+Poss |0] 
             [[%+Gen|%+Loc] %+KI [%+Plu|0]]*
             [Case|0];

read regex MAIN .o. PluRule .o. PossRule .o. KIRule .o. CaseRule .o. PhonemicsRule .o. ARule .o. HRule;
